Utah statutes.
31A-22-104.   Indemnity agreements and security for benefit of surety.
(1)  Any insurer authorized to do a surety business may contract with any
person, including a principal debtor under a suretyship obligation, for
indemnity or security to protect the surety against losses.   No indemnity
agreement or provision of security by the principal debtor releases from or
changes the liability of the principal debtor or of the sureties from the
terms established in the bond.  No surety may be indemnified through funds
held by the principal debtor in a fiduciary capacity.
(2)  Security may be in any of the following forms:
(a)  deposits of money or other property of the principal debtor which can be
held by a responsible financial institution authorized by law to do that type
of business, in a manner that prevents withdrawal or alienation of the money
or other property without the written consent of the sureties or an order of a
court of competent jurisdiction made after notice is given to the sureties and
a hearing is held as directed by the court; or
(b)  security interests in real or personal property perfected under the laws
of Utah.
(3)  This section does not affect a surety's common-law right to
reimbursement, subrogation, or exoneration.
